Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. Certificates of Title

Law reviews. —

For note, “Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title in Wyoming,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 47.

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 28 to 54.

Certificate of title as prerequisite of recovery for injury of motor vehicle, 7 ALR2d 1347.

Motor vehicle's certificate of title or similar document as, in hands of one other than legal owner, indicia of ownership justifying reliance by subsequent purchaser or mortgagee without actual notice of other interest, 18 ALR2d 813.

Liability of state, in issuing automobile certificate of title, for failure to discover title defect, 28 ALR4th 184.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 90 to 104.

§ 31-2-101.
Required application; resident and nonresident applications.

Except as provided by W.S.

31-2-102

and pursuant to W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxi)(A) through (G), any owner of a vehicle for which no Wyoming certificate of title has been issued to the owner or the transferee upon transfer of ownership of a vehicle for which a Wyoming certificate of title is required, shall apply for a certificate of title at the office of a county clerk, or if available, electronically, within the same time periods as required by W.S. 31-2-201(a)(ii) and (iii).

Any owner, owner’s agent or transferee upon transfer of ownership of any vehicle that has an identifying number pursuant to W.S. 31-1-101(a)(ix), including off-road recreational or multipurpose vehicles and, for the purpose of titling under this section, including snowmobiles and watercraft, shall apply for a certificate of title at the office of a county clerk.

Any nonresident person registered as a business entity under the laws of another state in the United States and who operates a vehicle in this state for business or commercial purposes for which no Wyoming certificate of title has been issued may apply for a certificate of title for that vehicle at the office of a county clerk, or if available, electronically.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1986, ch. 88, § 2; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of registration upon transfer of ownership, see §

31-2-214

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “pursuant to
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxi)(A) through (G)” for “subsection (b) of this section,” deleted “which will be operated on Wyoming highways and” following “owner of a vehicle” and added “or if available, electronically, within the same time periods as required by
W.S. 31-2-201(a)(ii) and (iii)”; rewrote (b), which read: “Every owner or transferee upon transfer of ownership of an off-road recreational vehicle may apply for a certificate of title at the office of a county clerk.” and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "; resident and nonresident applications" in the section heading; and added (c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: all-terrain vehicles (ATV's), 83 ALR4th 70.

§ 31-2-102.
Exemptions.

No certificate of title shall be issued for:

Vehicles owned by the United States;

Implements of husbandry, except multipurpose vehicles that qualify as implements of husbandry;

Vehicles of nonresident owners titled in another state, except as authorized by W.S. 31-2-101(c);

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 16, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 132, § 3; 1993, ch. 16, § 1; 1998, ch. 71, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; 2021 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to vehicles exempt from registration, see §

31-2-201

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, rewrote (a)(ii), which read: “Farm tractors”; deleted “If the vehicle is required to be registered in Wyoming, upon proper showing of the current registration in another state, the county clerk shall issue a special nontransferable certificate for registration purposes” at the end of (a)(iii); and repealed former (a)(iv), which read: “Utility trailers weighing one thousand (1,000) pounds or less unladen;” and former (a)(vi), which read: “Vehicles not required to be registered in Wyoming except as otherwise provided by law.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added ", except as authorized by W.S. 31-2-101(c)" in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-2-103.
Contents of application; signature; vehicle identification number; issuance of certificate.

Applications for paper certificates of title or electronic certificates of title, if available, shall contain or be accompanied by:

The name and address of the owner, the manner in which the ownership interest in the vehicle is to be held and the person to whom the certificate of title is to be delivered;

A description of the vehicle including make, vehicle identification number, type of body and motive power;

If a new vehicle purchased from a properly licensed dealer in any other state or a properly licensed Wyoming new vehicle dealer, as defined by W.S. 31-16-101(a)(xviii)(A):

The manufacturer’s certificate of origin indicating the date of sale to and the name of the first person receiving it from the manufacturer and a certification the vehicle was new when sold by the manufacturer, however, no person shall transfer ownership of a vehicle from a manufacturer’s statement of origin or a manufacturer’s certificate of origin unless the person is the manufacturer of the vehicle or a properly licensed dealer for that state and who holds a valid sales and service agreement from the manufacturer of the vehicle;

Certification by the properly licensed dealer that the vehicle was new when sold to the applicant; and

A statement from the dealer indicating the manufacturer’s suggested retail price (MSRP) for the make, model and trim level of the vehicle sold.

Certification of applicant’s ownership and any liens or encumbrances upon the vehicle;

The current title containing an assignment and warranty of title, if applicable, and an affidavit by the seller, either separate or contained on the current title, which shall contain a reference to the federal regulations stating that failure to complete or providing false information may result in fines and imprisonment and may include a department approved statement in substantially the following form: I state that the odometer now reads _________ miles (no tenths) and to the best of my knowledge that it reflects the actual mileage of the vehicle described herein unless one (1) of the following statements is checked: A. I hereby certify that to the best of my knowledge the odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage is in excess of its mechanical limits; B. I hereby certify that the odometer reading is NOT the actual mileage. WARNING-ODOMETER DISCREPANCY, to be retained by the county clerk upon issuance of a new title. This paragraph shall not apply to vehicles not originally manufactured with an odometer;

In the case of a vehicle registered or titled in a state other than Wyoming, or any homemade vehicle, rebuilt vehicle, reconstructed vehicle, any vehicle assembled from a kit or any vehicle for which a bond is required, a current statement made by a Wyoming law enforcement officer, or licensed Wyoming dealer only for vehicles in his inventory or possession, that the vehicle identification number on the vehicle has been inspected and that the inspection occurred in Wyoming and certifying the correct vehicle identification number displayed on the vehicle. Any licensed Wyoming dealer performing an inspection of a vehicle identification number under this section shall, in addition to the requirements of this act, do so pursuant to W.S.

31-11-108

. In the case of a vehicle not in Wyoming, the vehicle identification number may be inspected and certified on a form approved by the department if the inspection is made by an authorized law enforcement officer of a city, county or state law enforcement agency or a commissioned officer at a federal military installation or any other person authorized to do so by law and delivered to the county clerk in the county where the application for certificate of title is made along with payment for the inspection fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(b)(iv);

Factory price, or in lieu thereof, the valuation as prescribed by W.S. 31-3-101(c);

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 3.

Such other information as required by the department or county clerk which may include a vehicle bill of sale that substantially conforms with the form provided in W.S. 31-2-104(h)(ii), and any other documentation necessary to verify proof of ownership including an affidavit for proof of ownership or any surety bond required by this act. Any affidavit for proof of ownership shall be prescribed pursuant to W.S. 31-1-201(d) and shall be utilized by each county of this state;

A Wyoming certificate of title shall contain an appropriate notice whenever records readily accessible to the state indicate that the motor vehicle was previously issued a title or registration from any jurisdiction that bore any word or symbol signifying that the vehicle was “salvage”, “unrebuildable”, “parts only”, “scrap”, “junk”, “nonrepairable”, “reconstructed”, “rebuilt” or any other symbol or word of like kind, or that it has been damaged by flood. Any information concerning a motor vehicle’s status shall also be conveyed on any subsequent title issued for the vehicle by this state, including a duplicate or replacement title.

If the application for title is for a vehicle purchased from a properly licensed Wyoming dealer, the application may be signed by the dealer, include a statement of transfer by the dealer and of any lien retained by the dealer. Only a properly licensed Wyoming dealer may sign a statement of transfer.

If a vehicle to be titled has no vehicle identification number, the applicant shall apply for and obtain a number from the department pursuant to W.S.

31-11-105

.

Upon receipt of an application and payment of fees any county clerk shall, if satisfied that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle for which application for certificate of title is made, issue a paper certificate of title or electronic certificate of title, if available, upon a form or electronic format, approved by and provided at cost to the county clerk by the department in the name of the owner bearing the signature and seal of the county clerk’s office. The county clerk shall not deliver a certificate of title issued under this section until presentation of a receipt for payment of sales or use tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b) or presentation of a county treasurer receipt noting a valid exemption from paying the sales or use tax. If a lien is filed with respect to the vehicle, the county clerk shall, within three (3) business days, deliver a copy of the filed lien and a copy of the issued title to the financial institution and if available, such delivery may be made electronically. Each paper certificate of title or electronic version, shall bear a document control number with county designation and certificate of title number. The title shall be completely filled out giving a description of the vehicle including factory price in a manner prescribed by the department, indicate all encumbrances or liens on the vehicle and indicate the date of issue. Certificates of title shall contain forms for assignment of title or interest and warranty thereof by the owner with space for notation of liens and encumbrances at the time of transfer on the reverse side and contain space for the notarization of the seller’s signature for a sale or transfer of title. Certificates of title are valid for the vehicle so long as the vehicle is owned or held by the person in whose name the title was issued. A certificate of title is prima facie proof of ownership of the vehicle for which the certificate was issued.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, a person regularly engaged in the business of making loans or a supervised financial institution, as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(xix), that repossesses a motor vehicle on which it has filed a lien shall not be liable for sales or use tax or for any penalties for nonpayment of the sales or use tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b) prior to obtaining a title from the county clerk for that vehicle.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, an insurance company that acquires ownership of a motor vehicle pursuant to a damage settlement shall not be liable for sales or use tax or for any penalties for nonpayment of the sales or use tax pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b) prior to obtaining a title from the county clerk for that vehicle.

Any Wyoming law enforcement officer who determines from a physical inspection that the vehicle identification number has been removed, changed, altered or obliterated for any reason, shall proceed pursuant to W.S.

31-11-111

, unless the vehicle is in the process of obtaining a state assigned number pursuant to W.S.

31-11-105

.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1985, ch. 183, § 1; 1992, ch. 7, § 1; 1994, ch. 52, § 1; 1995, ch. 91, § 1; 1996, ch. 104, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2001, ch. 72, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 31, § 1; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement and perfection of security interests in vehicles and motor vehicles, see §§ 34.1-9-203 and 34.1-9-303.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “paper” and “or electronic certificates of title, if available”; rewrote the introductory language of (a)(iii), which read: “If a new vehicle purchased from a licensed dealer in any state”; added “however, no person shall transfer ownership of a vehicle from a manufacturer's statement of origin or a manufacturer's certificate of origin unless the person is the manufacturer of the vehicle or a properly licensed dealer for that state and who holds a valid sales and service agreement from the manufacturer of the vehicle” in (a)(iii)(A); inserted “properly licensed” in (a)(iii)(B); and added (a)(iii)(C); in (a)(v), substituted “may include a department approved statement in substantially the following form” for “include the following statement”; and added “This paragraph shall not apply to vehicles not originally manufactured with an odometer” at the end; rewrote (a)(vi), inserting “or any homemade vehicle, rebuilt vehicle, reconstructed vehicle, any vehicle assembled from a kit or any vehicle for which a bond is required” and “only” in the first sentence; inserting the second sentence; substituting “approved” for “prescribed” and “or any other person authorized to do so by law” for “and the form is duly notarized”; and deleting the former last two sentences pertaining to certificate of title or registration of a vehicle; rewrote (a)(ix), which read: “Such other information as required by the department or county clerk”; added (a)(x); in (b), deleted “new” preceding “vehicle” and inserted “properly” twice; added “pursuant to
W.S.

31-11-105

” in (c); rewrote (d), to include language regarding electronic format, and substituted “within three (3) business days” for “immediately”; added (g); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “shall contain” for “shall be under oath and contain,” in (a)(i), added “the manner in which the ownership interest in the vehicle is to be held” following “owner,” and in (a)(ix), substituted “include a vehicle bill of sale that substantially conforms with the form provided in W.S. 31-2-104(h)(ii), and any other documentation” for “include but not be limited to a vehicle bill of sale or similar document, any documentation”; and in (d), substituted “notarization of the seller’s signature for a sale” for “notarization of a sale.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or presentation of a county treasurer receipt noting a valid exemption from paying the sales or use tax” in the second sentence of (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 194, § 2, provides: “This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Issuance of certificate deemed governmental function. —

The issuance of a certificate of title to a motor vehicle by a county clerk, pursuant to this section, is a governmental function. Denver Buick v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970).

Uniform Commercial Code governs priority questions. —

The district court erred when it relied on the motor vehicle registration code rather than the Uniform Commercial Code (title 34.1) in determining whether a purchaser's claim was subject to the bank's prior lien and security interest. This chapter sets out the procedure for noting a lien on a title but does not resolve priority claims; the Uniform Commercial Code governs priority questions. Franklin v. First Nat'l Bank, 848 P.2d 775,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1993).

Immunity of county clerk. —

The county clerk is cloaked with the same immunity as the county would have when the county clerk performs the statutory duty of issuing a certificate of title. Denver Buick v. Pearson, 465 P.2d 512,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1970).

Gift. —

Ownership of a truck that was involved in an accident passed from an electric company's owner to a donee via an inter vivos gift in January 2008, and before appellant was injured in March 2008. Because the company no longer owned the truck and it was no longer covered under the insurer's policy, the district court did not err when it determined that the insurer did not have to cover appellant's injuries.
Mendenhall v. Mt. W. Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co., 2012 WY 46, 274 P.3d 407,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2012).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Automobiles — Chattel Mortgages — Recording,” see
3 Wyo. L.J. 92.

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).

§ 31-2-104.
Transfer of ownership.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the owner of a vehicle who sells or transfers his interest in a vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued shall endorse an assignment and warranty of title upon the certificate for the vehicle with a statement of all liens and encumbrances thereon, which assignment, warranty and statement shall be signed and dated by the owner before a notarial officer and acknowledged thereby in the manner provided by law, to be dated and delivered to the transferee at the time of delivering the vehicle. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the transferee shall present the certificate to a county clerk and apply for a new certificate of title within the same time periods as required by W.S. 31-2-201(a)(ii).

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 33, § 2.

If the transferee is a licensed dealer who holds the vehicle for resale, procures the certificate of title from the transferor and operates the vehicle only for demonstration purposes under dealer license plates, the dealer is not required to obtain a new certificate of title but may transfer the vehicle by an assignment and warranty of title upon the certificate of title or department approved statement of transfer form and deliver the certificate to a subsequent transferee.

In the event of a transfer by operation of law of any interest in a vehicle as upon an order in bankruptcy or insolvency, execution sale, repossession upon default in the performance of the terms of a lease or sales contract or otherwise than by voluntary act of the person whose title or interest is transferred, the administrator, receiver, trustee, sheriff, creditor or other representative or successor in interest of the person whose interest is transferred shall forward to the county clerk an application for a certificate of title together with a verified or certified statement of the transfer of interest. The statement shall set forth the reason for the involuntary transfer, the interest transferred, the name of the transferee, the process or procedure effecting the transfer and other information requested by the county clerk. Evidence and instruments otherwise required by law to effect a transfer of legal or equitable title to or an interest in a vehicle in such cases shall be furnished with the statement. If a transfer of title to a creditor is accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, a creditor retains the right to seek any deficiency balance which may exist after sale, provided the creditor has complied with all applicable law, and the transfer by itself shall not be considered a strict foreclosure or an election to retain the collateral in satisfaction of an obligation as provided by W.S. 34.1-9-620 and does not affect the debtor’s right to redeem the collateral under W.S. 34.1-9-623. If from the records of the county clerk there appears to be any lien on the vehicle which was recorded prior to the lien of the creditor applying for title and which has not been released, the certificate of title shall contain a statement of the lien. The creditor repossessing and applying for title to the vehicle shall notify all persons holding liens on the vehicle by certified mail return receipt requested at least fifteen (15) days prior to filing the application for title. Any proceeds from the sale, lease or other disposition of the vehicle shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 34.1-9-608.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 33, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 72, § 3.

Any person knowingly providing false or incomplete information on any statement required by this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 16, § 4.

The requirement under subsection (a) of this section to deliver a certificate of title to a transferee at the time the vehicle is delivered does not apply to a transferor if:

The certificate of title is being held by a bank or other financial institution on the date the vehicle is delivered. The transferor shall then deliver to the transferee a dealer’s invoice or a signed bill of sale, in substantially the form specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, and the certificate of title shall be delivered to the transferee within thirty (30) days from the date of the sale; or

The transferor is an auctioneer of vehicles and transfers the vehicle in the course of his business as an auctioneer of vehicles or through an auctioneer of vehicles. The transferor or auctioneer shall then deliver the certificate of title to the transferee within thirty (30) days of the date of sale and shall deliver to the transferee at the time the vehicle is delivered a signed bill of sale in substantially the following form:

VEHICLE BILL OF SALE I, (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEROR OR AUCTIONEER), on (date), hereby sell and convey all (my interest the interest of (name of current owner)) in the following described vehicle: (COLOR, YEAR, MAKE, MODEL, VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER) to (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEREE) in exchange for: (sales price). I hereby state that the certificate of title for the above described vehicle is held by (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEROR-VEHICLE AUCTIONEER, BANK OR OTHER FINANCIAL INSTITUTION) and that within thirty (30) days, (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEREE) will be provided a properly executed title free of all liens for the vehicle unless otherwise specified in this bill of sale. I certify (or declare) under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of Wyoming that the contents of this document are true and correct. DATE: (TRANSFEROR'S OR AUCTIONEER'S SIGNATURE) (TRANSFEROR’S OR AUCTIONEER’S ADDRESS, PHONE NUMBER AND DRIVER’S LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION OR DEALER NUMBER)

Click to view

If a vehicle is held by two (2) or more persons as joint tenants with right of survivorship clearly stated on the certificate of title, following the death of one (1) of the joint owners a surviving owner may apply to a county clerk for a new certificate of title in the name of the survivor or, if more than one (1) owner survives, jointly in the names of the survivors. The application for a new certificate of title shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased owner. The county clerk shall issue the new certificate of title as provided in W.S. 31-2-103(d), except that no sales or use tax shall be due when obtaining a certificate of title pursuant to this subsection.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (j) of this section, the surviving owner or owners of a vehicle held by joint tenants with the right of survivorship may transfer ownership without first obtaining a title in the name of the surviving owner or owners by complying with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and providing the transferee with a certified copy of the death certificate of the deceased owner. Any applicable sales or use tax shall be paid pursuant to W.S. 39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b).

If a vehicle is held by two (2) or more persons, any person identified as an owner on the certificate of title shall have the right to transfer all interest in the vehicle without the signature of any other owner on the title unless:

The title states the vehicle is held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship or tenancy by the entirety;

The title states the vehicle is held by co-owners in the conjunctive, by the use of the word “and” or other similar language, in which event transfer shall require the signature of each co-owner;

A transfer of all interests in the vehicle by an owner without the signature of any other owner is otherwise prohibited by law.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 1986, ch. 26, § 1; 1994, ch. 93, § 1; 1995, ch. 49, § 1; 1996, ch. 104, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, § 2; 2000, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 82, § 1; 2001, ch. 72, § 3; 2003, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 150, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 2, 4; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of registration, see §

31-2-214

.

As to transfer of title of decedent's motor vehicle without administration, see § 2-1-201(c).

As to notary publics generally, see chapter 1 of title 32.

The 2004 amendment,

in (f), deleted “required by subsection (e) of this section” following “the damage disclosure statement.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (j) and (k).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, inserted “or department approved statement of transfer form” in (b); substituted “any statement required by this act” for “the damage disclosure statement” in (f); and repealed former (g), which read: “No person shall transfer ownership of a vehicle from a manufacturer's statement of origin or a manufacturer's certificate of origin unless the person is the manufacturer of the vehicle or a properly licensed dealer.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “signed and dated” for “subscribed”; in (h)(i) and (h)(ii), substituted “signed bill of sale” for “signed, notarized bill of sale”; in the form for bills of sale, added the last sentence of the paragraph and “(TRANSFEROR'S OR AUCTIONEER'S ADDRESS, PHONE NUMBER AND DRIVER'S LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION OR DEALER NUMBER)” at the end of the form, and deleted “(BILL OF SALE MUST BE NOTARIZED)”; and added (m).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “motor” preceding “vehicle” in the introductory language of (m); and substituted “co-owners” for “coowners” twice in (m)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed act.

Laws 2019, ch. 194, § 2, provides: “This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Section not in conflict with Commercial Code. —

This section is not anywise in conflict with the Commercial Code. Shaffer v. Davidson, 445 P.2d 13,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1968).

Repossession of motor vehicle as “sale.” —

A repossession is considered by the legislature as a “sale”; otherwise, § 39-15-101(a)(vii) (definition of “sale” under State Sales Tax Act) would be superfluous. Rock Springs Ford Nissan v. State Bd. of Equalization, 890 P.2d 1100,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1995).

Effect of right to redeem. —

Where a debtor had a right to redeem a truck following its repossession, the right to redeem was an interest in the truck, and because the creditor had not sold the truck prior to filing of a bankruptcy case, the estate had an interest in the truck. Medved Chevrolet South, Inc. v. Royal (In re Picard), 2003 Bankr. LEXIS 781 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. July 14, 2003).

Cited

in

State ex rel. DOT v. Legarda, 2003 WY 130, 77 P.3d 708,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2003).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Motor Vehicle Certificates of Title in Wyoming,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 47.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Motor vehicle certificate of title or similar document as, in hands of one other than legal owner, indicia of ownership justifying reliance by subsequent purchaser or mortgagee without actual notice of other interests, 18 ALR2d 813.

§ 31-2-105.
Duplicate titles; affidavit of vehicle ownership.

Upon loss of a certificate of title, the owner may apply to the county clerk issuing the original title for a duplicate title. For purposes of applying for a duplicate title, “owner” means any one (1) person listed as owner on the face of the title. The applicant shall file an affidavit describing the loss with the county clerk. Upon payment of fees the county clerk shall issue a duplicate certificate of title corresponding to the original certificate and containing the following notation prominently displayed in capital letters on the face of the certificate: “THIS IS A DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE AND MAY BE SUBJECT TO THE RIGHTS OF A PERSON OR PERSONS UNDER THE ORIGINAL CERTIFICATE”.

If an applicant for a certificate of title required by this act is unable to provide the county clerk with a certificate of title that assigns the prior owner’s interest, a notarized bill of sale or other evidence of ownership that satisfies the county clerk that the applicant owns the vehicle, a certificate of title may be issued only if:

The applicant submits an affidavit of vehicle ownership on a form prescribed by the department that shall be signed and sworn before a person who is authorized to administer oaths and affirmations. The affidavit shall contain:

A complete description of the vehicle;

A recital of facts and circumstances by which the applicant acquired the ownership and possession of the vehicle including the previous owner’s name and address and why the applicant is unable to provide the clerk with the information required in subsection (b) of this section;

A disclosure of any and all security interests, liens or encumbrances that are known to the applicant and that are outstanding against the vehicle;

A statement that the applicant is the true and lawful owner of the vehicle and has the right to have a certificate of title issued.

In addition to the affidavit of ownership, the applicant shall furnish the county clerk an indemnity bond as specified by this section.

If the vehicle for which the applicant is applying for a certificate of title has a value less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), a title may be issued without a bond if the applicant presents an affidavit of vehicle ownership, a notarized bill of sale, a certified, written statement of the value from a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer and a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection, or any other information the county clerk may require for proof of ownership, at the time of application.

Any bond required by this section shall be executed by a surety duly authorized to carry on business in Wyoming or by individual sureties qualified as provided by W.S.

1-1-104

and

1-1-105

. The amount of any bond required under this section shall not be less than double the value of the vehicle determined at the time of the application. If the value of the vehicle cannot be determined from any prior registration or title, the applicant shall provide the county clerk the value of the vehicle. The value of the vehicle shall be determined by the applicant or the surety from any current national appraisal guide, current or past registration if the value is present on any registration for the vehicle, or the value may be on certified written statement obtained from a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer. The bond shall be conditioned to indemnify a prior owner, lienholder, subsequent purchaser, secured creditor or encumbrancer of the vehicle and any respective successors in interest against expenses, losses or damages, including reasonable attorney fees, caused by the issuance of the certificate of title or by a defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the right, title and interest of the applicant in the vehicle.

If any person suffers a loss or damage by reason of the filing or issuance of the certificate of title as provided in this section, such person shall have a right of action to seek relief directly against the applicant and the surety on the applicant’s bond against either of whom the person damaged may proceed independently of the other, but the aggregate liability of the surety to any or all persons seeking relief shall not exceed the total amount of the bond.

If an applicant is applying for title to a vehicle which he will restore for his own personal use, title may be issued without a bond required by this section if the applicant presents an affidavit of vehicle ownership, a notarized bill of sale, a certified written statement of the value of the vehicle and a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection, at the time of application. If the value of the vehicle cannot be determined from any prior registration or title, the applicant shall provide the county clerk the value of the vehicle. The value of the vehicle shall be determined from any current national appraisal guide, or the applicant may elect to submit a certified written statement obtained from a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer stating the appraised value of the vehicle. Any title issued under this subsection shall state on its face that it is nontransferable for one hundred eighty (180) days from the date title issued. Notwithstanding the other requirements of this subsection, a vehicle shall only be eligible to be titled under this subsection if, on the date the applicant purchased the vehicle it was not operational and could not have been rendered operational without substantial repairs to one (1) or more of the vehicle’s mechanical systems. The department shall define the term “substantial repairs” by rule and regulation.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 3; 2009, ch. 16, § 2; 2011, ch. 172, § 1; 2013 ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2009 amendment,

effective January 1, 2010, substituted “as specified in this section” for “in an amount of not less than double the value of the vehicle shown upon the registration of the vehicle,” and deleted the former last two sentences which read: “The bond shall be executed by a surety duly authorized to carry on business in Wyoming or by individual sureties qualified as provided by W.S.

1-1-104

and

1-1-105

. Bonds shall be conditioned for protection and indemnification of all persons who may have any interest in or dealing with the vehicle against any loss which may occur by reason of the issuance of the duplicate certificate before the 11th day after the affidavit is filed”; and added (b) through (e).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (f).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00)” for “six hundred dollars ($600.00)” in (c).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted
the former last sentence,
which read: “No duplicate certificate
shall be issued before
the 11th day after the affidavit is filed
unless the owner deposits
an indemnity bond to the state of Wyoming
with the county clerk as
specified in this section.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in (a).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-1-101(a)(xxii).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Adopts the ‘1972 Amendments’ to Uniform Commercial Code Article 9 — The Revisions and Some Continuing Problems,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 581 (1984).